Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.118, is amended to read: 124D.118 SCHOOL MILK PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Legislative findings. new text begin (a) new text end The legislature finds that for best health and well-being, school children in the state should receive at least one serving of milk each day. new text begin (b)new text end The new text begin legislature finds that the new text end school milk program deleted text begin established in this section is to provide districtsdeleted text end new text begin for kindergartners provides schoolsnew text end in the state with added resources so that all kindergarten students in public and nonpublic schools may have access to wholesome milk on a daily basis. new text begin (c) The legislature finds that the school lunch milk program provides an additional nutritional benefit to students. The legislature also finds that some students interested in receiving only school milk at lunch take a complete school lunch and consume only the milk. The school lunch milk program provides schools with resources so that students in public and nonpublic schools may have daily access to school milk to supplement meals brought from home, eliminating the need for a student to take a complete school meal only to obtain the school milk at lunch. new text end Subd. 2. deleted text begin Establishment; school participationdeleted text end new text begin Kindergarten milknew text end . Each deleted text begin districtdeleted text end new text begin schoolnew text end in the state is encouraged to participate in the state-supported school milk program for kindergartners. Participating deleted text begin districtsdeleted text end new text begin schoolsnew text end must provide one serving of milk on each school day to each kindergarten student attending a public or nonpublic school in the district. No student is required to accept the milk that is provided by the district. The program must be promoted and operated under the direction of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee. new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin School lunch milk. new text end new text begin Each school in the state is encouraged to participate in the state-supported school lunch milk program. The program provides one half-pint of milk for a student desiring a school milk at lunch who does not take part in the school lunch program on that day. The school lunch milk program provides milk to students and eliminates unnecessary food waste. new text end Subd. 3. Program guidelines; duties of the commissioner. (a) The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end : (1) encourage all districts to participate in the school milk program for kindergartnersnew text begin and the school lunch milk programnew text end ; (2) prepare program guidelinesnew text begin for the school milk program for kindergartnersnew text end , not subject to chapter 14 until July 1, 1998, which will effectively and efficiently distribute appropriated and donated money to participating districts; and (3) seek donations and matching funds from appropriate private and public sources. (b) Program guidelines may provide for disbursement to districts through a mechanism of prepayments or by reimbursement for approved program expenses. new text begin (c) The commissioner may establish program guidelines for school lunch milk served in place of a school lunch by a participant in the national school lunch program under section 124D.111. new text end Subd. 4. Reimbursementnew text begin ; breakfast milk and school lunch milknew text end . new text begin (a) new text end In accordance with program guidelines, the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end reimburse each participating public or nonpublic school 20 cents for each half-pint of milk that is served to kindergarten students and is not part of a school lunch or breakfast reimbursed under section 124D.111 or 124D.1158. new text begin (b) The commissioner must reimburse each public or nonpublic school participating in the free meals program for each half-pint of milk served to a student who brings a meal from home on that day or otherwise forgoes a school lunch provided at no cost on that day. The reimbursement rate for each half-pint of milk equals the greater of 50 cents or the special school milk rate established by the United States Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Services division for that school year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; SCHOOL MILK.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin School milk. new text end new text begin For kindergarten milk and school lunch milk aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.118: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end